Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.840

Board of adjustment—Notice of time and place of hearing on conditional permit.

Upon the filing of an application for a conditional use permit or a variance as set forth in RCW 36.70.810, the board of adjustment shall set the time and place for a public hearing on such matter, and written notice thereof shall be addressed through the United States mail to all property owners of record within a radius of three hundred feet of the exterior boundaries of subject property. The written notice shall be mailed not less than twelve days prior to the hearing.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.840. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 84.]